incubator/apertium-snd/apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="mascName__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ءَ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--from CIIL grammar -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="femName__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ءَ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--from CIIL grammar -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="قرآن__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

<!--declinable-->
<!-- All the /-o/ ending adjectives are declinable. They inflect according to the gender and case of the followed noun. -->

    <pardef n="سٺ/و__adj">
      <e><p><l>و</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r>و<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نارنگي__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="تمام__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="هاڻي__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Particles -->

    <pardef n="ها__part">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="__vblex_inf">	<!--generic-->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ٿو__vblex"> <!-- FIXME: not a copula!! verb "to happen" ||  -->
      <e><p><l>ٿيڻ</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ٿو</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿي</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿا</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿيون</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>پيو</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>پيا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>پئي</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>پئيون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>پيون</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--pp & past -->
      <e><p><l>ٿيو</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿيا</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿي</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿيون</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ٿيندو</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿيندي</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿيندا</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ٿينديون</l><r>ٿو<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<!-- Continuous present tense. Identical with the indefinite present and only the auxiliary verb tho/ tha/thi/thyű is replaced by /pyo /pya /pei / peyű/ respectively. -->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="نواز"><i>نواز</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ايوب"><i>ايوب</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="عثمان"><i>عثمان</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="عبدال"><i>عبدال</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="وآله"><i>وآله</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="شاهه"><i>شاهه</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="عبداللطيف"><i>عبداللطيف</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪارل"><i>ڪارل</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="لطيف"><i>لطيف</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="فيروز"><i>فيروز</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="رحيم"><i>رحيم</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="سقراط"><i>سقراط</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="قادر"><i>قادر</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بيدل"><i>بيدل</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="رضا"><i>رضا</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="جمال"><i>جمال</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نقشبندي"><i>نقشبندي</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ڀرڳڙي"><i>ڀرڳڙي</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="الهيار"><i>الهيار</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ريمنڊ"><i>ريمنڊ</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کهڙو"><i>کهڙو</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="جيلاني"><i>جيلاني</i><par n="mascName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="شريعت"><i>شريعت</i><par n="femName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="رضيه"><i>رضيه</i><par n="femName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ممتاز"><i>ممتاز</i><par n="femName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بينظير"><i>بينظير</i><par n="femName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ايشيا"><i>ايشيا</i><par n="femName__np"/></e>
    <e lm="قرآن"><i>قرآن</i><par n="قرآن__np"/></e>
    <e lm="وڪيپيڊيا"><i>وڪيپيڊيا</i><par n="قرآن__np"/></e>
    <e lm="گوگل"><i>گوگل</i><par n="قرآن__np"/></e>
    <e lm="سنڌوديش"><i>سنڌوديش</i><par n="قرآن__np"/></e>
    <e lm="گهڻو"><i>گهڻ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ساڳيو"><i>ساڳي</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گندو"><i>گند</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پورو"><i>پور</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مٺو"><i>مٺ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مٺڙو"><i>مٺڙ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سهڻو"><i>سهڻ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ڏاڍو"><i>ڏاڍ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ٿورو"><i>ٿور</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="وڏو"><i>وڏ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪڙو"><i>ڪڙ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مهانگو"><i>مهانگ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ننڍڙو"><i>ننڍڙ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ننڍو"><i>ننڍ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سولو"><i>سول</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ٿڌو"><i>ٿڌ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ايترو"><i>ايتر</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪارو"><i>ڪار</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پيلو"><i>پيل</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نيرو"><i>نير</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ڦڪو"><i>ڦڪ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="اهڙو"><i>اهڙ</i><par n="سٺ/و__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سليٽي"><i>سليٽي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گلابي"><i>گلابي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="واڱڻائي"><i>واڱڻائي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نارنگي"><i>نارنگي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سياسي"><i>سياسي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ناسي"><i>ناسي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="فيروزي"><i>فيروزي</i><par n="نارنگي__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="قانوني"><i>قانوني</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ماهرَ"><i>ماهرَ</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پابند"><i>پابند</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="تخليقي"><i>تخليقي</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="لبرل"><i>لبرل</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="وچون"><i>وچون</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="بيعت"><i>بيعت</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="رورل"><i>رورل</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ماضيءَ"><i>ماضيءَ</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گرفتار"><i>گرفتار</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="عمومي"><i>عمومي</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="صليبي"><i>صليبي</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="زباني"><i>زباني</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="برابر"><i>برابر</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="باقي"><i>باقي</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="برو"><i>برو</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="شائع"><i>شائع</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="امانتدار"><i>امانتدار</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="هوادار"><i>هوادار</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="صرف"><i>صرف</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مختلف"><i>مختلف</i><par n="تمام__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪونه"><i>ڪونه</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪونهي"><i>ڪونهي</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ها"><i>ها</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="پڪ"><i>پڪ</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ضرور"><i>ضرور</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪانه"><i>ڪانه</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪين"><i>ڪين</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="نڪو"><i>نڪو</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ته"><i>ته</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="صِرف"><i>صِرف</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="صرف"><i>صرف</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="رڳو"><i>رڳو</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="فَقَت"><i>فَقَت</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="فقت"><i>فقت</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ئي"><i>ئي</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="صحيح"><i>صحيح</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڇو نه"><i>ڇو<b/>نه</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪجهه به"><i>ڪجهه<b/>به</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪڏهن به"><i>ڪڏهن<b/>به</i><par n="ها__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪيترا"><i>ڪيترا</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ٽيهر"><i>ٽيهر</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اوترو"><i>اوترو</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="قانونن"><i>قانونن</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="وڌيڪ"><i>وڌيڪ</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="يعني"><i>يعني</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بهتر"><i>بهتر</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪڏهن"><i>ڪڏهن</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هتي"><i>هتي</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="پريان"><i>پريان</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="گهڻو"><i>گهڻو</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪلهه"><i>ڪلهه</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اتان"><i>اتان</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تيترو"><i>تيترو</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بلڪه"><i>بلڪه</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪيڏاهن"><i>ڪيڏاهن</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="جهٽ"><i>جهٽ</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪالهه"><i>ڪالهه</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="غلط"><i>غلط</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="فورا"><i>فورا</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تنهنڪري"><i>تنهنڪري</i><par n="هاڻي__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هجڻ"><i>هجڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="ملڻ"><i>ملڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="پڙهڻ"><i>پڙهڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="ڏيڻ"><i>ڏيڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="وڌڻ"><i>وڌڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="هلائڻ"><i>هلائڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="بنائڻ"><i>بنائڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="کائڻ"><i>کائڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="پهچڻ"><i>پهچڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="وٺڻ"><i>وٺڻ</i><par n="__vblex_inf"/></e>
    <e lm="ٿو"><i></i><par n="/ٿو__vblex"/></e>
